Utah statutes.
58-76-502.   Penalty for unlawful conduct.
(1) (a)  If, upon inspection or investigation, the division concludes that a
person has violated Section 58-76-501 or any rule or order issued with respect
to Section 58-76-501, and that disciplinary action is appropriate, the
director or the director's designee from within the division shall promptly
issue a citation to the person according to this chapter and any pertinent
rules, attempt to negotiate a stipulated settlement, or notify the person to
appear before an adjudicative proceeding conducted under Title 63G, Chapter 4,
Administrative Procedures Act.
(i)  A person who violates Subsections 58-1-501(1)(a) through (d) or Section
58-76-501 or any rule or order issued with respect to Section 58-76-501, as
evidenced by an uncontested citation, a stipulated settlement, or by a finding
of violation in an adjudicative proceeding, may be assessed a fine pursuant to
this Subsection (1) and may, in addition to or in lieu of, be ordered to cease
and desist from violating Subsections 58-1-501(1)(a) through (d) or Section
58-76-501 or any rule or order issued with respect to this section.
(ii)  Except for a cease and desist order, the licensure sanctions cited in
Section 58-76-401 may not be assessed through a citation.
(b)  A citation shall:
(i)  be in writing;
(ii)  describe with particularity the nature of the violation, including a
reference to the provision of the chapter, rule, or order alleged to have been
violated;
(iii)  clearly state that the recipient must notify the division in writing
within 20 calendar days of service of the citation if the recipient wishes to
contest the citation at a hearing conducted under Title 63G, Chapter 4,
Administrative Procedures Act; and
(iv)  clearly explain the consequences of failure to timely contest the
citation or to make payment of any fines assessed by the citation within the
time specified in the citation.
(c)  The division may issue a notice in lieu of a citation.
(d)  Each citation issued under this section, or a copy of each citation, may
be served upon any person upon whom a summons may be served in accordance with
the Utah Rules of Civil Procedure and may be made personally or upon the
person's agent by a division investigator or by any person specially
designated by the director or by mail.
(e)  If within 20 calendar days from the service of the citation, the person
to whom the citation was issued fails to request a hearing to contest the
citation, the citation becomes the final order of the division and is not
subject to further agency review.  The period to contest a citation may be
extended by the division for cause.
(f)  The division may refuse to issue or renew, suspend, revoke, or place on
probation the license of a licensee who fails to comply with a citation after
it becomes final.
(g)  The failure of an applicant for licensure to comply with a citation after
it becomes final is a ground for denial of license.
(h)  No citation may be issued under this section after the expiration of six
months following the occurrence of any violation.
(i)  The director or the director's designee shall assess fines according to
the following:
(i)  for a first offense handled pursuant to Subsection (1)(a), a fine of up
to $1,000;
(ii)  for a second offense handled pursuant to Subsection (1)(a), a fine of up
to $2,000; and
(iii)  for any subsequent offense handled pursuant to Subsection (1)(a), a
fine of up to $2,000 for each day of continued offense.
(2)  An action initiated for a first or second offense which has not yet
resulted in a final order of the division shall not preclude initiation of any
subsequent action for a second or subsequent offense during the pendency of
any preceding action.  The final order on a subsequent action shall be
considered a second or subsequent offense, respectively, provided the
preceding action resulted in a first or second offense, respectively.
(3)  Any penalty which is not paid may be collected by the director by either
referring the matter to a collection agency or bringing an action in the
district court of the county in which the person against whom the penalty is
imposed resides or in the county where the office of the director is located.
Any county attorney or the attorney general of the state shall provide legal
assistance and advice to the director in any action to collect the penalty.
In any action brought to enforce the provisions of this section, reasonable
attorney's fees and costs shall be awarded to the division.
